Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
§ 6. Due process of law.

No person shall be deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law.

I. In General.

II. Particular Statutes and Proceedings Considered.

I.In General.

“Liberty” means liberty to do anything not unlawful.

The liberty envisioned by this section is not alone a liberty of person such as is offended by enslavement, imprisonment or other restraint. It contemplates a person's liberty to do all that is not made unlawful. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Life, liberty or property may be protected. —

If a person cannot be deprived of life, liberty or property without due process of law, he necessarily must have the right to protect it. Cross v. State, 370 P.2d 371,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1962).

Petition to intervene brought by irrigators to adjudicate water rights was properly dismissed by the district court, pursuant to Rule 12(b)(6), W.R.C.P., as the matter was barred by res judicata and the petition was untimely. The disputed reservoir certificates were previously adjudicated in 1963; moreover, the district court's decision to dismiss the matter did not impinge on the irrigators' due process rights. In re General Adjudication of All Rights to use Water in the Big Horn River System, 2004 WY 21, 85 P.3d 981,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2004).

And a person is not to be deprived of his liberty

without due process of law. Holm v. State, 404 P.2d 740,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1965).

Statute in violation of due process cannot stand. —

No statute which deprives a person of life, liberty, or property without due process of law, contrary to this section, can stand. Holm v. State, 404 P.2d 740,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1965).

Neither property rights nor contract rights are absolute.

Such rights are relative. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Property rights and the right to make contracts should be free from governmental interference; still these rights are not absolute. This of course means the sovereign may, in proper circumstance, limit the exercise of these rights. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Persons may make or refrain from making contracts. —

Persons are at liberty to make lawful contracts. Equally, persons are at liberty to refrain from making contracts. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

A legislative act which purports to burden a person with a contractual covenant agreed to by private parties or private interests, but not agreed to by the nonsigning retailer, violates that person's liberty not to so contract if he elects, and robs that person of his liberty without due process. Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Due process clause has a substantive aspect as well as a procedural one.

State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Due process required for enhancement. —

Because sentencing enhancement provision for battery against a household member did not contain a notice requirement, defendant was entitled to reasonable notice and an opportunity to be heard regarding the possibility of an enhanced sentence for recidivism which was satisfied where he was notified in the original charging documents that a conviction on the current charge would constitute his third conviction under the Family Violence Protection Act, and at his arraignment, defendant was notified of the prior convictions upon which the state later relied for enhanced sentencing. Messer v. State, 2004 WY 98, 96 P.3d 12,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 123

(Wyo. 2004).

Formality or informality of procedure

is unrelated to the constitutional right of due process. Holm v. State, 404 P.2d 740,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1965).

No personal jurisdiction due to insufficient contacts with
Wyoming. —

Personal jurisdiction was lacking in a defamation case in which the parties' contractual dealings took place outside Wyoming, no defamatory statements were shown to have been made in Wyoming, and any contacts with Wyoming were attenuated. Cheyenne Publ., LLC v. Starostka, 2004 WY 88, 94 P.3d 463,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2004).

Employment at will. —

The right of the individuals to employment could not be violated when either party could terminate the employment contract at will; no interference with a property right is present in that instance which would justify reliance upon the due process clause. Allhusen v. State, 898 P.2d 878,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1995), (decided prior to 2001 amendments to the Mental Health Professions Practice Act).

All are entitled to be informed as to what the state commands or forbids.

State v. Gallegos, 384 P.2d 967,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1963); Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

And speculation as to meaning of penal statutes cannot be required.
—

No one may be required at peril of life, liberty or property to speculate as to the meaning of penal statutes. State v. Gallegos, 384 P.2d 967,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1963); Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Hence, vague criminal statute violates due process. —

A criminal statute which either forbids or requires the doing of an act in terms so vague that men of common intelligence must necessarily guess at its meaning and differ as to its application violates the first essential of due process of law. State v. Gallegos, 384 P.2d 967,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1963); Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Criminal statutes cannot be couched in terms so vague and indefinite as to deny due process to an accused. State v. Gallegos, 384 P.2d 967,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1963).

The requirement of a reasonable degree of certainty in legislation, especially in the criminal law, is a well-established element of the guarantee of due process of law. State v. Gallegos, 384 P.2d 967,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1963); Sanchez v. State, 567 P.2d 270,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 309

(Wyo. 1977).

Right to be apprised and confront evidence. —

One of the most basic elements of due process is the right of each party to be apprised of all the evidence upon which an issue is to be decided, with the right to examine, explain, or rebut such evidence. The right to hear and controvert all evidence upon which a factual adjudication is to be made includes the right to hear and cross-examine witnesses. Holm v. State, 404 P.2d 740,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1965).

Partnership was not bound by arbitrations where it was not furnished with notice or an opportunity to be heard. Pecha v. Smith, Keller & Assocs., 942 P.2d 387,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1997).

Court may deny access to tape recorded statement. —

In a juvenile proceeding, defendant's constitutional rights were not violated as a result of the court denying him access to the alleged victim's tape-recorded statement where the record evidenced that defendant failed to show any of the required elements for advancing a Brady claim where initially, defendant was unable to establish that the investigatory tape was lost or destroyed because of the calculated, bad faith effort of authorities with the intent to deny him the tape. All that was established was that the detective was unable to locate the investigatory tape for production and defendant was unable to establish that the evidence was constitutionally material and that its exculpatory value was apparent to authorities prior to its loss or destruction. KC v. State, 2004 WY 74, 92 P.3d 805,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2004).

Notice that party in action entitled to receive. —

If a person entitled to notice has a reasonable opportunity to know the claims of the opposing party and to meet them, and is put on inquiry with respect to any contentions that might be doubtful, he has received the notice required by constitutional law. Department of Revenue & Taxation, Motor Vehicle Div. v. Andrews, 671 P.2d 1239,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 377

(Wyo. 1983).

Notice sufficient where property owner apprised of issues in
controversy. —

The notice which must be given in terminating a professor's teaching contract, must afford the person who is being deprived of a property interest a reasonable opportunity to know the claims of the opposing party and to meet them. The requirements of the law are met where the notice given is not misleading and apprises the property owner of the issues in controversy. White v. Board of Trustees, 648 P.2d 528,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 361

(Wyo. 1982), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1107, 103 S. Ct. 732, 74 L. Ed. 2d 956, 1983 U.S. LEXIS 2894 (U.S. 1983).

Published notice of proposed changes to land use management
plan did not violate landowners' right to due process. —

Landowners' right to procedural due process was not violated by the adoption of a land use management plan because the statutory notice was given; a published notice that identifies the particular issues discussed, even in general terms, is sufficient. Laughter v. Bd. of County Comm'rs, 2005 WY 54, 110 P.3d 875,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Wyo. 2005).

Service of process on foreign corporation. —

Due process requires only that the representative served with process be a responsible representative of the foreign corporation. Ford Motor Co. v. Arguello, 382 P.2d 886,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 1963).

Due process violation for inadequate notice to doctor. —

In a proceeding to suspend his license to practice medicine, a doctor was deprived of his constitutional right to due process by the state medical board of examiner's failure to provide the requisite notice under § 16-3-114(c)(ii)(D). Devous v. Wyoming State Bd. of Medical Examiners, 845 P.2d 408,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1993).

This section does not interfere with the police power of the state to enact laws for the general welfare

of the people. At the same time any law in furtherance of the police power must be reasonable and not arbitrary. Pirie v. Kamps, 68 Wyo. 83, 229 P.2d 927,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1951); Kalman v. Western Union Tel. Co., 390 P.2d 724,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 1964).

This section does not state that “no person shall be deprived of life, liberty or property,” but states that no person shall be deprived thereof “without due process of law.” That is a recognition of the fact that the natural and inherent rights are not absolute or unlimited, but are relative. It is a recognition, in other words, of the police power. That power, giving the legislature the right to enact laws for the health, safety, comfort, moral and general welfare of the people, is an attribute of sovereignty, is essential for every civilized government, is inherent in the legislature except as expressly limited, and no express grant thereof is necessary. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

But the due process clause has a substantive aspect which definitely limits police power.

Bulova Watch Co. v. Zale Jewelry Co., 371 P.2d 409,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1962).

Police power is not unlimited, but is subject to the limitations of due process. Schakel v. State, 513 P.2d 412,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1973).

Purpose of statute must be within scope of police power. —

In order that a statute may be valid, the purpose, aim or end thereof must be within the scope or purview of the police power. State v. Langley, 53 Wyo. 332, 84 P.2d 767,

1938 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1938).

Burden on party claiming infringement. —

A party claiming an infringement of his constitutional rights must assume the burden of demonstrating that infringement. He is required to show that he has a protected interest of life, liberty or property, and that the interest has been affected in an impermissible way. Meyer v. Norman, 780 P.2d 283,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1989).

One who assails the classification in a law must carry the burden

of showing that it does not rest upon any reasonable basis, but is essentially arbitrary. Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1963); Mountain Fuel Supply Co. v. Emerson, 578 P.2d 1351,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 292

(Wyo. 1978).

And mere assertions of discrimination are insufficient. —

A person contesting the constitutionality of a statute must do more than make bald assertions of what he thinks is discriminatory. Bell v. Gray, 377 P.2d 924,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1963).

Voluntariness of confession. —

In an indecent act case, a court did not err by denying defendant's motion to suppress because defendant's confession was voluntary where he went to the police station at the request of a police officer, but he was not under arrest, he was given Miranda warnings before the interview commenced, which he waived, and although the police officer was insistent and persistent in his questioning, he did not force defendant to answer questions. Goulart v. State, 2003 WY 108, 76 P.3d 1230,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2003).

In a murder case, a court properly denied defendant's motion to suppress his statements because they were voluntary where he did not affirmatively invoke his right to remain silent. Defendant's statements that he did not really want to talk to the officers and that he had nothing to tell the officers were not unambiguous invocations of his right to remain silent; they were ambiguous with regards to whether or not he was affirmatively invoking his right to remain silent. Pena v. State, 2004 WY 115, 98 P.3d 857,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2004).

In a murder case, a court properly denied defendant's motion to suppress his statements because they were voluntary where officers properly complied with Miranda; defendant understood English, he was read his rights, he clearly indicated that he understood those rights, and defendant's responses indicated no confusion on his part. Pena v. State, 2004 WY 115, 98 P.3d 857,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 2004).

Confession was properly admitted where defendant arrived at the police station voluntarily, he was given his Miranda warnings, there was no suggestion that any of the officers questioned defendant after he requested counsel, and his first attempt to initiate re-contact with the officers failed because they would not speak with him unless he signed a request for contact form, which he was reluctant to do. Bhutto v. State, 2005 WY 78, 114 P.3d 1252,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2005).

Murder defendant's ineffective assistance of counsel claim based on counsel's failure to file a motion to suppress his statements failed because defendant's will was not overborne due to sleep deprivation or intoxication, and no showing was made of police misconduct during the interview, meaning defendant's statements were voluntarily given to detectives.
Carter v. State, 2010 WY 136, 241 P.3d 476,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 2010).

Voluntariness of statements. —

Counsel was not ineffective for failing to file a motion to suppress defendant's statements to officers because defendant did not demonstrate that a suppression motion based on the alleged Miranda violation would have been granted as it did not appear that defendant was subjected to express questioning, or its functional equivalent, prior to being advised of his Miranda rights. After he was arrested, an officer located defendant in a patrol vehicle, read him his Miranda rights, and defendant indicated that he understood his rights and that he wanted to waive those rights and make a statement. Grissom v. State, 2005 WY 132, 121 P.3d 127,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2005).

Statements made by defendant to investigator did not have to be suppressed as involuntary statements because defendant initiated communications with investigator, defendant was informed of his Miranda rights by investigator, and while defendant had previously invoked his right to counsel prior to one of the communications, he knowingly and voluntarily waived that right prior to speaking with investigator.
Hicks v. State, 2008 WY 83, 187 P.3d 877,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2008).

Trustee should have been given notice and opportunity to be heard to protect her interest, if any, in disputed property; trustee had not been given opportunity to present argument or evidence regarding question of whether sale should have been approved.
Capshaw v. Osbon, 2008 WY 95, 190 P.3d 156,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2008).

In defendant's sexual abuse case, defendant's statement was not
involuntary because, while defendant claimed that he was extremely
fatigued, there was nothing in the interview that showed that to
be
the case. Defendant never asked to end the interview, or complained
about being tired, he also continually denied the allegations against
him in the midst of the religious references made by the deputy,
and
defendant had been informed of his Miranda warnings. Mersereau v. State, 2012 WY 125, 286 P.3d 97,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2012);

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(2012).

No error in failing to suppress non-custodial interrogation.
—

In defendant's sexual assault case, a court did not err by denying defendant's motion to suppress his confession where the confession was non-custodial because he went to the station of his own will, he was told he did not have to answer questions, would not be arrested that day, and was free to leave at any time. In addition, the confession was voluntary as the trial court held a full evidentiary hearing on defendant's motion to suppress the statements and had the opportunity to hear the witness' testimony and weigh their credibility. Hannon v. State, 2004 WY 8, 84 P.3d 320,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 2004).

Defendant's statements to police did not violate his self-incrimination rights where the detective characterized the interrogation as her posing questions to defendant and he ‘answered if he wanted to.’ He took advantage of that option by refusing to identify his supplier or customers, despite the fact the occupants were watched to ensure that no evidence was compromised, they were allowed to do what they pleased, defendant apparently slept for a great deal of the time the officers searched the premises, and, when he needed to relieve himself, the officers respected his choice to go outside rather than be accompanied to the restroom by an officer. Gompf v. State, 2005 WY 112, 120 P.3d 980,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 134

(Wyo. 2005).

Defendant's statement to police was voluntary where his car was not ‘blocked in’ by the officers, he was informed that he was not under arrest and that he did not have to talk to the officers, the officers were in plain clothes, and the entire encounter lasted less than thirty minutes. Jelle v. State, 2005 WY 111, 119 P.3d 403,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2005).

Statements while intoxicated were voluntary. —

In a case where defendant gave a confession to taking indecent liberties with a minor, a motion to suppress evidence was properly denied. Although witnesses testified that defendant was intoxicated both before and after the interview, this was not enough to justify suppression where defendant gave appropriate answers and appeared to have understood the questions posed during the interview, and defendant initiated contact with police after requesting an attorney. The fact that defendant might have been led to believe that his leaving after the questioning was a possibility was not sufficient evidence of coercion. Gordon v. State, 2004 WY 105, 97 P.3d 64,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2004).

Counsel not ineffective for failing to argue for suppression
of statements due to evidence of intoxication. —

Counsel were not ineffective at a suppression hearing regarding the voluntariness of defendant's statements due to intoxication where it was apparent from a transcript of the interview that he was responsive and gave coherent, detailed answers to the detective's questions and that he was able to converse with the detective. Siler v. State, 2005 WY 73, 115 P.3d 14,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2005).

Waiver of rights. —

Defendant waived his due process right to be heard by voluntarily absenting himself from the scheduled hearing of which he had notice. Jones v. Jones, 903 P.2d 545,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 187

(Wyo. 1995).

Due process clause requires availability of hearing when protected property interest is involved.

AT & T Communications of Mountain States v. State Bd. of Equalization, 768 P.2d 580,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1989).

Juror selection error must be harmful. —

In defendant's sexual exploitation case, although the trial court erred by denying a challenge for cause to a juror because there was no statement from the juror that he would be able to consider the case only on the evidence presented in court under the law, as instructed, without regard to his stated bias, the error was not prejudicial to defendant. There was nothing to indicate that any of the jurors who served on the panel were not qualified to serve. All of the jurors including the two identified by defendant as likely recipients of a peremptory challenge if he had had one available were passed for cause. Since there was no demonstration that the jury was not impartial and that defendant was denied a fair trial, he could not meet his burden of showing harmful error. Klahn v. State, 2004 WY 94, 96 P.3d 472,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. Sept. 21, 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 963, 125 S. Ct. 1726, 161 L. Ed. 2d 605, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3005 (U.S. 2005).

“Biased” juror may be rehabilitated. —

In defendant's sexual exploitation case, a court did not err by failing to grant defendant's challenge for cause to a juror who showed a bias where the trial court, after fully exploring the juror's perceived prejudice and having the opportunity to listen to her answers and observe her demeanor, concluded that there were no grounds for a challenge for cause, and the juror was sufficiently rehabilitated. Klahn v. State, 2004 WY 94, 96 P.3d 472,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 2004), reh'g denied,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 146

(Wyo. Sept. 21, 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 963, 125 S. Ct. 1726, 161 L. Ed. 2d 605, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3005 (U.S. 2005).

Exposure of jury to information about accused's other crimes.
—

The exposure of the jury panel to information by a prospective juror that the accused was possibly involved in another crime is the type of situation which requires unfair prejudice to be presumed and requires the jury panel be disqualified. Miller v. State, 904 P.2d 344,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1995).

Criteria for giving jury instruction is existence of evidence.
—

The review required by the trial court, in determining whether the accused has a right to have a theory of the defense instruction, directs attention only to the existence of an evidentiary basis for the jury's consideration and not a criteria of some convincing character of the evidence as analyzed by the trial court or the appellate jurist. Stagner v. State, 842 P.2d 520,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1992).

Legislature may not prohibit occupations, unless detrimental

to public welfare. Weaver v. Public Serv. Comm'n, 40 Wyo. 462, 278 P. 542,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1929).

Word “willfully” in penal statute is not ambiguous.

Todd v. State, 566 P.2d 597,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1977).

Effective assistance of counsel. —

Counsel were not ineffective for conceding defendant's guilt in a murder case where it was apparent from the record that counsel sought to avoid a first-degree murder conviction by admitting that defendant stabbed and killed the victim, undermining the requisite mental state for first-degree murder due to his intoxication, and asking the jury for a verdict of manslaughter based on the circumstances surrounding the stabbing. Siler v. State, 2005 WY 73, 115 P.3d 14,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2005).

Lack of counsel never harmless error. —

The assistance of counsel is such a basic right that the lack of such assistance can never be treated as harmless error. It is too fundamental and absolute to allow courts to indulge in nice calculations as to the amount of prejudice arising from its denial. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Error to allow counsel to withdraw but deny request for continuance.
—

In a child visitation case, a father was denied due process where a court erred by allowing the father's counsel to withdraw one day before the trial and by denying his request for a continuance to obtain substitute counsel. The father was not extended notice concerning his counsel's motion to withdraw, there was no withdrawal hearing, and he was not notified of the withdrawal order. Moreover, the visitation hearing was so abbreviated that the trial court could not reasonably have concluded that evidence had been presented of such a change warranting modification of visitation or that modification was in the best interest of the child. Sims v. Day, 2004 WY 124, 99 P.3d 964,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2004).

When joint representation denies effective assistance of counsel.
—

A defendant is denied the fundamental right of effective assistance of counsel when the trial court requires joint representation of defendants over timely objections; prejudice is then presumed and need not be independently shown. Chavez v. State, 604 P.2d 1341,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 505

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 446 U.S. 984, 100 S. Ct. 2967, 64 L. Ed. 2d 841, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 1922 (U.S. 1980).

Prosecution's intrusion into attorney-client relationship.
—

The prosecution's intrusion into the attorney-client relationship of the defendant and his defense counsel did not substantially prejudice the defendant's defense where a deputy sheriff had devulged to the prosecutor the substance of some of the conversations between defense counsel and the defendant that he had overheard during trial preparation sessions at which he was present for security reasons. Haworth v. State, 840 P.2d 912,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1992), cert. denied, 508 U.S. 930, 113 S. Ct. 2395, 124 L. Ed. 2d 296, 1993 U.S. LEXIS 3540 (U.S. 1993).

Vindictive prosecution not shown. —

Where defendant was charged with possession and concealment of the stolen property and disposing of the identical stolen property, the second count having previously been charged, but that case was dismissed without prejudice after the jury was seated and the first witness was sworn, and the jury in the second trial found defendant guilty of both counts, but the trial judge sentenced him only on count I, later dismissing count II, the defendant did not show there was vindictive prosecution because he was charged with the second count in the second trial. Crozier v. State, 882 P.2d 1230,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1994), limited, State v. Newman, 2004 WY 41, 88 P.3d 445,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 2004).

Defendant's right to a fair trial.—

Defendant was deprived of a fair trial because prosecutorial misconduct occurred when the State of Wyoming failed to comply with the district court’s discovery order and when the prosecutor made improper comments during closing argument and because the district court abused its discretion in requiring defendant to wear a leg restraint at trial without conducting a hearing to evaluate the necessity for the restraint. Black v. State, 2017 WY 135, 405 P.3d 1045,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2017).

Prosecutor's comments did not cause defendant to have an unfair
trial. —

Pursuant to plain error review, defendant was not denied a fair trial where prosecutor's comments did not have a deleterious effect on the jury's verdict. The prosecutor's comments did not cross the line between legitimate argument and illegitimate vouching for the credibility of the State's witnesses, and he did not directly state that it was his opinion that the witnesses were credible nor did he give that impression or suggest that the jurors did not have that determination to make. Moe v. State, 2005 WY 58, 110 P.3d 1206,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. 2005), reh'g denied,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. June 29, 2005).

Right to fair trial not violated by prosecutor's remarks. —

In a vehicular homicide case, defendant's right to a fair trial was not violated by prosecutor's remarks during opening and closing argument regarding the effect that the victim's death would have on family and friends where the evidence of defendant's guilt was overwhelming, the district court gave a jury instruction immediately prior to the prosecutor's opening statement, and the district court also specifically instructed the jury to disregard the prosecutor's remarks immediately after they occurred. Whitney v. State, 2004 WY 118, 99 P.3d 457,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2004), cert. denied, 544 U.S. 1001, 125 S. Ct. 1931, 161 L. Ed. 2d 775, 2005 U.S. LEXIS 3570 (U.S. 2005).

In defendant's indecent liberties case, the prosecutor's closing argument, which included remarks that it was the jury's duty and that the right thing to do was to find defendant guilty, did not deprive defendant of his right to a fair trial. Defendant was not prejudiced by the fleeting comments, especially in light of the district court's comprehensive instructions to the jury that it could only consider the evidence presented during the trial, and it was not likely that the verdict would have been more favorable to the defendant had they not been made. Person v. State, 2004 WY 149, 100 P.3d 1270,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 190

(Wyo. 2004).

Prosecutorial misconduct not prejudicial due to court instructions.
—

In an arson case, defendant was not denied his right to a fair trial based on prosecutorial misconduct where the prosecutor made a valid inquiry into defendant's ability to recall with accuracy the events that occurred before, during and after the time of the fire. Although the prosecutor made an improper comment regarding defendant “skipping out on a bill,” the district court sustained an objection, and the jury was given both oral and written instructions to disregard any testimony for which an objection was sustained. In addition, the existence of a check was as well known to defendant as it was to the prosecution, so the evidence was not withheld. Strickland v. State, 2004 WY 91, 94 P.3d 1034,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2004).

No violation in denying motion to change judge. —

In a child custody case, a judge did not violate a mother's due process rights with respect to her motion for a change of judge because the judge gave substantive consideration of the motion in a manner appropriate to the circumstances. The district court held a hearing. Although the district court declined to hear the mother's testimony on the change of judge issue, choosing instead to rely solely on her affidavit, the mother's attorney did not make an offer of proof as to what her live testimony might have added to the affidavit. Mace v. Nocera, 2004 WY 154, 101 P.3d 921,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2004).

Gender-based classifications are not ipso facto invalid.

A v. X, Y, & Z, 641 P.2d 1222,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 307

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 459 U.S. 1021, 103 S. Ct. 388, 74 L. Ed. 2d 518, 1982 U.S. LEXIS 4426 (U.S. 1982).

Wyoming does not recognize claim under section when no state action is alleged.

Hatfield v. Rochelle Coal Co., 813 P.2d 1308,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 1991).

Failure of administrative agency to follow own rules. —

Administrative agency must follow its own rules as they have the force and effect of law; however, a person asserting an agency's rule violations must show how the breach denied her due process or violated her fundamental rights. MN v. State, Dep't of Family Servs. (In the Interest of
MN), 2003 WY 135, 78 P.3d 232,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2003).

I.Presentence confinement credit.

District court
erred in ruling that it did not have authority to award pre-sentence
confinement credit for the time defendant spent in in-patient treatment
where even though defendant was not in official detention, Wyoming
case law made clear that trial judges had discretion to grant or
deny
credit for time served in presentence custody if the custody
was not
due to defendant's indigency and the amount of time plus
the sentence
did not exceed the maximum allowable sentence. Daniels v. State, 2014 WY 125, 335 P.3d 483,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2014).

Given the
district court told defendant he would receive credit for the time
he spent successfully completing in-patient treatment, it abused
its
discretion by subsequently denying such credit without justification. Daniels v. State, 2014 WY 125, 335 P.3d 483,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 142

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Bass v. City of Casper, 28 Wyo. 387, 205 P. 1008,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1922); J. Ray McDermott & Co., v. Hudson, 370 P.2d 364,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 1962); Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962); DS v. Department of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs., 607 P.2d 911,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 245

(Wyo. 1980); State v. Laude, 654 P.2d 1223,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 415

(Wyo. 1982); Sheridan Newspapers, Inc. v. City of Sheridan, 660 P.2d 785,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1983); Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988); Gale v. State, 792 P.2d 570,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1990); Meridian Aggregates Co. v. Wyoming State Bd. of Equalization, 827 P.2d 375,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1992); McNeiley v. Ayres Jewelry Co., 886 P.2d 595,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1994); Michael v. Hertzler, 900 P.2d 1144,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(Wyo. 1995); KT v. State, 902 P.2d 1288,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 178

(Wyo. 1995); Yung v. State, 906 P.2d 1028,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1995); Daniel v. State, 923 P.2d 728,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1996); Kolb v. State, 930 P.2d 1238,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1996); Williams v. State, 2002 WY 136, 54 P.3d 248,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 2002); White v. State, 2003 WY 163, 80 P.3d 642,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 2003).

Quoted

in

Thomas v. Jultak, 68 Wyo. 198, 231 P.2d 974,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1950); Nickelson v. People, 607 P.2d 904,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 239

(Wyo. 1980); Galesburg Construction Co. v. Board of Trustees, 641 P.2d 745,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 308

(Wyo. 1982); State v. McAdams, 714 P.2d 1236,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 658

(Wyo. 1986); White v. State, 784 P.2d 1313,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1989); Barron v. Barron, 834 P.2d 685,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1992); Roderick v. State, 858 P.2d 538,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 138

(Wyo. 1993); RPM v. State, Dep't of Family Servs., 917 P.2d 169,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1996); Heilig v. Wyo. Game & Fish Comm'n, 2003 WY 27, 64 P.3d 734,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2003).

Stated

in

Day v. Armstrong, 362 P.2d 137,

1961 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1961); Weiss v. State ex rel. Cardine, 455 P.2d 904,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1969); Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984); Allied Fid. Ins. Co. v. Environmental Quality Council, 753 P.2d 1038,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 1988); In re Contempt Order Issued Against Anderson, 765 P.2d 933,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 177

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Smith v. State, 2005 WY 113, 119 P.3d 411,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(2005)State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(1909);
State v. Berry, 36 Wyo. 257, 254 P. 488,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(1927);
Moore v. Jarvis, 44 Wyo. 92, 8 P.2d 818,

1932 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(1932);
Fristam v. City of Sheridan, 66 Wyo. 143, 206 P.2d 741,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(1949);
Eastwood v. Wyoming Hwy. Dep't, 76 Wyo. 247, 301 P.2d 818,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1956);
J. Ray McDermott & Co. v. Hudson, 348 P.2d 73,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 1962);
Hansen v. Smith, 395 P.2d 944,

1964 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1964);
Williams v. Eaton, 310 F. Supp. 1342, 1970 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12370 (D. Wyo. 1970);
Harding v. State, 478 P.2d 64,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 212

(Wyo. 1970);
Boggs v. State, 484 P.2d 711,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1971);
Griffith ex rel. Workmen's Comp. Dep't v. Stephenson, 494 P.2d 546,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 234

(Wyo. 1972);
Jackson v. Wyoming State Treas. ex. rel. Workmen's Comp. Dep't, 521 P.2d 571,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 196

(Wyo. 1974);
Hays v. State, 522 P.2d 1004,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 1974);
Tri-County Elec. Ass'n v. City of Gillette, 525 P.2d 3,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 226

(Wyo. 1974);
Cranston v. Thomson, 530 P.2d 726,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 124

(Wyo. 1975);
State v. Rosachi, 549 P.2d 318,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 188

(Wyo. 1976);
Neu v. Grant, 548 F.2d 281,

1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 10584

(10th Cir. 1977);
Hampton v. State, 558 P.2d 504,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 221

(Wyo. 1977);
State ex rel. Weber v. Municipal Court, 567 P.2d 698,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 311

(Wyo. 1977);
Schoeller v. Board of County Comm'rs, 568 P.2d 869,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 314

(Wyo. 1977);
Mayland v. State, 568 P.2d 897,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1977);
Cherniwchan v. State, 594 P.2d 464,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 406

(Wyo. 1979);
Goodman v. State, 601 P.2d 178,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 473

(Wyo. 1979);
Nimmo v. State, 607 P.2d 344,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 243

(Wyo. 1980);
Great W. Sugar Co. v. Johnson, 624 P.2d 1184,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1981);
Wyoming Bd. of Equalization v. State ex rel. Basin Elec. Power Coop., 637 P.2d 248,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 396

(Wyo. 1981);
Horn v. District Court, 647 P.2d 1368,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 356

(Wyo. 1982);
Board of County Comm'rs v. Teton County Youth Servs., Inc., 652 P.2d 400,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 393

(Wyo. 1982);
Hopkinson v. State, 664 P.2d 43,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1983);
Tader v. Tader, 737 P.2d 1065,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 457

(Wyo. 1987);
Miller v. Campbell County, 722 F. Supp. 687, 1989 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 11685 (D. Wyo. 1989);
Kautza v. City of Cody, 812 P.2d 143,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1991); In
Interest of DG, 825 P.2d 369,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1992);
M.M. v. State, 827 P.2d 1117,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1992);
Davila v. State, 831 P.2d 204,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1992);
Wlodarczyk v. State, 836 P.2d 279,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 80

(Wyo. 1992);
Sandstrom v. Sandstrom, 880 P.2d 103,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 1994);
Higgins v. State, 889 P.2d 964,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1995);
Herdt v. State, 891 P.2d 793,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1995);
Kahrs v. Board of Trustees for Platte County Sch. Dist. No. 1, 901 P.2d 404,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1995);
Talbott v. State, 902 P.2d 719,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 17

4

(Wyo. 1995);
Perry v. State, 927 P.2d 1158,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 1996);
Simmers v. State, 943 P.2d 1189,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 1997);
Ottema v. State ex rel. Wyoming Worker's Comp. Div., 968 P.2d 41,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 1998);
RS v. Johnson County Dept. of Family Servs. (In re JL), 989 P.2d 1268,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1999);
MTM v. LD, 2002 WY 26, 41 P.3d 522,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2002);
Lancaster v. State, 2002 WY 45, 43 P.3d 80,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 49

(Wyo. 2002);
O'Brien v. State, 2002 WY 63, 45 P.3d 225,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(Wyo. 2002);
Rice v. State, 2004 WY 130, 100 P.3d 371,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(2004);
Smith v. State, 2005 WY 113, 119 P.3d 411,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 136

(2005); Hoke v. Motel
6 Jackson & Accor N. Am., Inc., 2006 WY 38, 131 P.3d 369,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. Mar. 27, 2006); Kovach v. State, 2013 WY 46,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Apr 19, 2013); Lundahl v. Gregg, 2014 WY 110,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Sept. 5, 2014); Lundahl v. Gregg, 2014 WY 110,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Sept. 5, 2014); Sam v. State, 2017 WY 98, 401 P.3d 834,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Constitutionality of the Wyoming Underground Water Statute,” see 3 Wyo. L.J. 140.

For comment, “The Constitutionality of Automobile Compensation Plans in Wyoming,” see 5 Land & Water L. Rev. 191 (1970).
